Washington statutes.
RCW 39.32.010

Definitions.

For the purposes of RCW 39.32.010 through 39.32.060:

The term "eligible donee" means any public agency carrying out or promoting for the residents of a given political area one or more public purposes, such as conservation, economic development, education, parks and recreation, public health, and public safety; or nonprofit educational or public health institutions or organizations, such as medical institutions, hospitals, clinics, health centers, schools, colleges, universities, schools for persons with intellectual disabilities, schools for persons with physical disabilities, child care centers, radio and television stations licensed by the federal communications commission as educational radio or educational television stations, museums attended by the public, and public libraries serving all residents of a community, district, state, or region, and which are exempt from taxation under Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, for purposes of education or public health, including research for any such purpose.

The term "public agency" means the state or any subdivision thereof, including any unit of local government, economic development district, emergency services organization, or any instrumentality created by compact or other agreement between the state and a political subdivision, or any Indian tribe, band, group, or community located on a state reservation.

The term "surplus property" means any property, title to which is in the federal, state, or local government or any department or agency thereof, and which property is to be disposed of as surplus under any act of congress or the legislature or local statute, heretofore or hereafter enacted providing for such disposition.

[ 2010 c 94 s 10; 1995 c 137 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 135 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 70 s 1; 1945 c 205 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-60.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2010 c 94: See note following RCW 44.04.280.